Utah statutes.
54-18-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Affected entity" means an entity as defined in Sections 10-9a-103 and
17-27a-103.
(2)  "Affected landowner" means an owner of a property interest, as reflected
in the most recent county or city tax records as receiving a property tax
notice, whose property is located within a proposed corridor.
(3) (a)  "Construction" means the excavation, construction, and installation
of a high voltage electric power line or upgraded high voltage transmission
line.
(b)  "Construction" does not include:
(i)  the temporary use of sites; or
(ii)  studies and tests for:
(A)  requirements of this chapter;
(B)  state regulations;
(C)  federal regulations;
(D)  securing geological and survey data; or
(E)  any other actions taken by a public utility reasonably necessary to
determine the location of a target study area or proposed corridor.
(4)  "High voltage power line" means:
(a)  an electrical high voltage power line with a nominal voltage of 230
kilovolts or more; and
(b)  an upgraded high voltage power line.
(5)  "Land use application" has the same meaning as provided in Sections
10-9a-103 and 17-27a-103.
(6)  "Land use authority" has the same meaning as provided in Sections
10-9a-103 and 17-27a-103.
(7)  "Land use permit" has the same meaning as Sections 10-9a-103 and
17-27a-103.
(8)  "Legislative body" has the same meaning as provided in Sections 10-9a-103
and 17-27a-103.
(9)  "Proposed corridor" means the transmission line route within a target
study area selected by the public utility as the public utility's proposed
alignment for a high voltage power line.
(10)  "Proposed route" means the right-of-way needed for construction of the
high voltage power line.
(11)  "Public utility" has the same meaning as provided in Section 54-2-1.
(12)  "Target study area" means the geographic area for a new high voltage
transmission line or an upgraded high voltage power line as proposed by a
public utility.
(13)  "Upgraded high voltage power line" means increasing the voltage of an
existing transmission line to 230 kilovolts or more.
